California, session 20252026, AB434.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Safe and Secure Battery Storage Act.SECTION 1.Part 9 (commencing with Section 14570) is added to Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code, to read:SEC. 2. Part 9 (commencing with Section 14970) is added to Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code, to read:PART 9. Battery Energy Storage Facilities14570.14970. For purpose of this part, the following definitions apply:(a) “Battery energy storage facility” means a facility using commercially available energy storage technology capable of storing 200 megawatthours or more of electricity that uses a battery as the storage medium to provide energy onsite or offsite.(b) “Public agency” includes a state agency, board, or commission, county, including a charter county, city and county, city, including, a charter city, regional agency, public district, redevelopment agency, or other political subdivision.14571.14971. On or before January 1, 2028, the State Fire Marshal shall adopt guidelines and minimum standards for the construction of a battery energy storage facility to prevent fires and protect nearby communities from any fire hazard posed by the battery energy storage facility.14572.14972. (a) On or before January 1, 2028, a public agency shall not authorize the construction of a battery energy storage facility.(b) On and after January 1, 2028, when authorizing the construction of a battery energy storage facility, a public agency shall require that the construction of the battery energy storage facility meet the guidelines and minimum standards adopted pursuant to Section 14571 or more stringent guidelines and standards as determined appropriate by the public agency.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. Section 25545 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:25545. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a) “California Native American tribe” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 21073.(b) “Facility” means any of the following:(1) A solar photovoltaic or terrestrial wind electrical generating powerplant with a generating capacity of 50 megawatts or more and any facilities appurtenant thereto.(2) An energy storage system as defined in Section 2835 of the Public Utilities Code that is capable of storing 200 megawatthours or more of energy and that does not use a battery as a storage medium.(3) A stationary electrical generating powerplant using any source of thermal energy, with a generating capacity of 50 megawatts or more, excluding any powerplant that burns, uses, or relies on fossil or nuclear fuels.(4) A discretionary project as described in Section 21080 for which the applicant has certified that a capital investment of at least two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) will be made over a period of five years and the discretionary project is for (A) the manufacture, production, or assembly of an energy storage system or component manufacturing, wind system or component manufacturing, and solar photovoltaic energy system or component manufacturing, or (B) the manufacture, production, or assembly of specialized products, components, or systems that are integral to renewable energy or energy storage technologies.(5) An electrical transmission line carrying electricity from a facility described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) that is located in the state to a point of junction with any interconnected electrical transmission system.(6) A hydrogen production facility and associated onsite storage and processing facilities that do not derive hydrogen from a fossil fuel feedstock and that receive funding from any of the following:(A) The Hydrogen Program established pursuant to Section 25664.1.(B) Section 91530.(C) The Alliance for Renewable Clean Hydrogen Energy Systems (ARCHES) authorized by Article 15 (commencing with Section 12100.160) of Chapter 1.6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, as awarded by the United States Department of Energy Office of Clean Energy Demonstrations.(c) “Site” means a location on which an eligible facility is constructed or is proposed to be constructed.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.